Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.070

Department of health—Advice/assistance of advisory committee.

The department of health may seek the advice and assistance of the advisory committee in administering this chapter, including, but not limited to:

(1) Advice and recommendations regarding the establishment or implementation of rules related to the administration of this chapter;

(2) Advice, recommendations, and consultation regarding case disposition guidelines and priorities related to unprofessional conduct cases regarding licensed mental health counselors, licensed clinical social workers, licensed advanced social workers, and licensed marriage and family therapists;

(3) Assistance and consultation of individual committee members as needed in the review, analysis, and disposition of reports of unprofessional conduct and consumer complaints;

(4) Assistance and recommendations to enhance consumer education; and

(5) Assistance and recommendations regarding any continuing education and continuing competency programs administered under the provisions of the [this] chapter.

[ 2001 c 251 s 7.]